incubator/apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
    <pardef n="ag__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ag</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agam</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agat</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aige</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aici</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>againn</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agaibh</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>acu</l>
          <r>ag<s n="pr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ca/ra__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rad</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irde</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irde</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irde</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irde</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ca/t__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ear__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eara</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/eart__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irt</l>
          <r>eart<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irt</l>
          <r>eart<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eart</l>
          <r>eart<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>earta</l>
          <r>eart<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>earta</l>
          <r>eart<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eart</l>
          <r>eart<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irt</l>
          <r>eart<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gné/as__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asanna</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asanna</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asanna</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asanna</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bó/thar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>thar</l>
          <r>thar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>thair</l>
          <r>thar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>thair</l>
          <r>thar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>thar</l>
          <r>thar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithre</l>
          <r>thar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithre</l>
          <r>thar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithre</l>
          <r>thar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithre</l>
          <r>thar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ag"><par n="ag__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="cara"><par n="c_init"/><i>a</i><par n="ca/ra__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cat"><par n="c_init"/><i>a</i><par n="ca/t__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gnéas"><par n="g_init"/><i>né</i><par n="gné/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bóthar"><par n="b_init"/><i>ó</i><par n="bó/thar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fear"><par n="f_init"/><par n="f/ear__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ardfhear"><par n="a_init"/><i>rdfh</i><par n="f/ear__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barrfhear"><par n="b_init"/><i>arrfh</i><par n="f/ear__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ógfhear"><par n="ó_init"/><i>gfh</i><par n="f/ear__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rífhear"><i>rífh</i><par n="f/ear__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saorfhear"><par n="s_init"/><i>aorfh</i><par n="f/ear__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seanfhear"><par n="s_init"/><i>eanfh</i><par n="f/ear__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ainbheart"><par n="a_init"/><i>inbh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aincheart"><par n="a_init"/><i>inch</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beart"><par n="b_init"/><i></i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bodbheart"><par n="b_init"/><i>odbh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceannbheart"><par n="c_init"/><i>eannbh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceart"><par n="c_init"/><i></i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cilibheart"><par n="c_init"/><i>ilibh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cíochbheart"><par n="c_init"/><i>íochbh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cóipcheart"><par n="c_init"/><i>óipch</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="coisbheart"><par n="c_init"/><i>oisbh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="críochbheart"><par n="c_init"/><i>ríochbh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deisceart"><par n="d_init"/><i>eisc</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="díseart"><par n="d_init"/><i>ís</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dobheart"><par n="d_init"/><i>obh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drochbheart"><par n="d_init"/><i>rochbh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dúbheart"><par n="d_init"/><i>úbh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="éigeart"><par n="é_init"/><i>ig</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feillbheart"><par n="f_init"/><i>eillbh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forneart"><par n="f_init"/><i>orn</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frithbheart"><par n="f_init"/><i>rithbh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iardheisceart"><par n="i_init"/><i>ardheisc</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iarthuaisceart"><par n="i_init"/><i>arthuaisc</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="idirbheart"><par n="i_init"/><i>dirbh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meigibheart"><par n="m_init"/><i>eigibh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="míbheart"><par n="m_init"/><i>íbh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neart"><i>n</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oilbheart"><par n="o_init"/><i>ilbh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oirbheart"><par n="o_init"/><i>irbh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oirdheisceart"><par n="o_init"/><i>irdheisc</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="réamhbheart"><i>réamhbh</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuaisceart"><par n="t_init"/><i>uaisc</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
